Arkansas, session 2025, HB1583.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 79, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:

Subchapter 29 — Coverage for Acquired Brain Injury

23-79-2901. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) "Acquired brain injury" means an injury to the brain that
occurs after birth and may be caused by:
(A) An infectious disease;
(B) A metabolic disorder;
(C) An endocrine disorder;
(D) Diminished oxygen;
(E) A brain tumor;
(F) A toxin;
(G) A disease that affects the blood supply to the brain;
(H) A stroke; or
(I) A traumatic brain injury;
*ANS278*
03-06-2025 13:42:40 ANS278

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 HB1583
(2) "Adverse determination" means a determination by a clinical
peer reviewer, upon review based on the clinical information provided, that
an admission, extension of stay, or any other covered acquired brain injury
service is not medically necessary;
(3) "Clinical peer reviewer" means a healthcare professional
who:
(A) Specializes in and has experiences of the delivery of
treatments and services for an individual with acquired brain injuries; and
(B)(i) If applicable, possesses a current and valid
license, certificate, or registration to provide treatments and services of
an acquired brain injury.
(ii) If a license, certificate, or registration is
not required for treatments and services of an acquired brain injury, the
healthcare professional shall be credentialed by the national accrediting
body appropriate to the profession;
(4) "Cognitive communication therapy" means treating a problem
with communication that has an underlying cause in one (1) or more cognitive
deficits rather than a primary language or speech deficit;
(5) "Cognitive rehabilitation therapy" means a process of
relearning cognitive skills essential for daily living through the
coordinated, specialized, and integrated therapeutic treatments that are
provided in dynamic settings designed for efficient and effective relearning
following damage to brain cells or brain chemistry due to an acquired brain
injury;
(6) "Community reintegration services" means the provision of
incremental guided real-world therapeutic training to develop skills
essential for an enrollee to:
(A) Participate in life;
(B) Reenter employment;
(C) Attend school and engage in other productive activity;
(D) Safely live independently; and
(E) Participate within his or her community while avoiding
rehospitalization and long-term support needs;
(7) "Enrollee" means an individual entitled to coverage of
healthcare services from a healthcare insurer;
(8)(A) "Functional rehabilitation therapy" means a structured
03-06-2025 13:42:40 ANS278

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 HB1583
approach that emphasizes learning by doing and focuses on relearning a
specific task in a prescribed format with maximum opportunity for repeated
corrective practice.
(B) "Functional rehabilitation therapy" includes:
(i) Compensatory strategies that are developed for
relearning skills that are persistently impaired; and
(ii) Training for individuals on daily
implementation of the compensatory strategies, with a focus on relearning
those skills essential for safe daily living in a home or community setting
to ensure acquisition and use of the skills;
(9)(A) "Health benefit plan" means an individual, blanket, or
group plan or a policy or contract for healthcare services offered, issued,
renewed, delivered, or extended in this state by a healthcare insurer.
(B) “Health benefit plan” includes indemnity and managed care plans.
(C) “Health benefit plan” does not include:
(i) A plan that provides only dental benefits or eye
and vision care benefits;
(ii) A disability income plan;
(iii) A credit insurance plan;
(iv) Insurance coverage issued as a supplement to
liability insurance;
(v) A medical payment under an automobile or
homeowners insurance plan;
(vi) A health benefit plan provided under Arkansas
Constitution, Article 5, § 32, the Workers' Compensation Law, § 11-9-101 et
seq., or the Public Employee Workers' Compensation Act, § 21-5-601 et seq.;
(vii) A plan that provides only indemnity for
hospital confinement;
(viii) An accident-only plan;
(ix) A specified disease plan;
(x) A long-term-care-only plan; or
(xi) A plan providing health benefits to state and
public school employees under § 21-5-401 et seq;
(10)(A) "Healthcare insurer" means an entity subject to the
insurance laws of this state or the jurisdiction of the Insurance
Commissioner that contracts or offers to contract to provide health insurance
03-06-2025 13:42:40 ANS278

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 HB1583
coverage, including without limitation an insurance company, a hospital and
medical service corporation, a health maintenance organization, a self-
insured governmental or church plan in this state, or a nonprofit
agricultural membership organization as defined in § 23-60-104.
(B) "Healthcare insurer" does not include an entity that
provides only dental benefits or eye and vision care benefits;
(11) "Medically necessary" means healthcare services that are
consistent with generally accepted principles of professional medical
practice;
(12) "Neurobehavioral therapy" means a set of medical and
therapeutic assessments and treatments focused on behavioral impairments
associated with brain disease or an acquired brain injury and the
amelioration of these impairments through the development of prosocial
behavior;
(13) "Neurocognitive therapy" means a treatment of disorders in
which the primary clinical deficit is in cognitive function that has not been
present since birth and is a decline from a previously attained level of
function;
(14)(A) "Neurofeedback therapy" means a direct training of brain
function to enhance self-regulatory capacity or a patient's ability to exert
control over behavior, thoughts, and feelings.
(B) "Neurofeedback therapy" includes a form of biofeedback
through which an enrollee can learn to control brain activity that is
measured and recorded by an electroencephalogram;
(15) "Neuropsychological testing" means a set of medical and
therapeutic assessments and treatments focused on the amelioration of
cognitive, emotional, psychosocial, and behavioral deficits caused by an
acquired brain injury; and
(16)(A) "Post-acute care residential treatment" means an
integrated medical and therapeutic service, treatment, education, and skills
training program provided in a home or community setting.
(B) "Post-acute care residential treatment" includes
treatment that is designed to create the maximum opportunity for correct
practice of skill in the context of use to develop new neural pathways to
enable the enrollee to avoid rehospitalization and long-term care.

03-06-2025 13:42:40 ANS278

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 HB1583
23-79-2902. Coverage for medically necessary treatment related to
acquired brain injury.
(a)(1) On and after January 1, 2026, a health benefit plan that is
offered, issued, renewed, delivered, or extended in this state shall provide
coverage to an enrollee for medically necessary treatment related to or as a
result of an acquired brain injury.
(2) As required under subdivision (a)(1) of this section,
medically necessary treatment shall include without limitation:
(A) Cognitive rehabilitation therapy;
(B) Cognitive communication therapy;
(C) Community reintegration services;
(D) Functional rehabilitation therapy;
(E) Neurocognitive therapy and rehabilitation;
(F) Home and community-based treatment;
(G) Inpatient services;
(H) Neurobehavioral therapy, neurocognitive therapy, and
neuropsychological testing;
(I) Neurofeedback therapy;
(J) Outpatient and day treatment services; and
(K) Post-acute care residential treatment services.
(b) The coverage for medically necessary treatment for an acquired
brain injury under subdivision (a)(1) of this section:
(1)(A) Is not subject to a lifetime limitation or an
unreasonable annual limitation of the number of days or sessions of medically
necessary treatment services.
(B) A limitation on rehabilitation services in an
inpatient rehabilitation facility shall be:
(i) Separate from and shall not be included in any
limitation of post-acute care rehabilitation services; and
(ii) Stated separately by the healthcare insurer;
(2) Is not subject to a greater deductible, coinsurance,
copayment, or out-of-pocket limits than any other benefit provided by a
healthcare insurer under a health benefit plan; and
(3) Does not diminish or limit benefits otherwise allowable
under a health benefit plan.
(c) For medically necessary treatment covered under this section, only
03-06-2025 13:42:40 ANS278

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 HB1583
a clinical peer reviewer may preauthorize coverage or conduct utilization
review.
(d) The Insurance Commissioner shall promulgate rules to create a
process to permit an expedited appeal of an adverse determination by the
healthcare insurer for medically necessary treatment covered under this
section.
(e) An individual practitioner and treatment facility shall be
qualified to provide acute care and post-acute care rehabilitation services
to an enrollee with an acquired brain injury through possession of the
appropriate licenses, accreditation, training, and experience deemed
customary and routine in the appropriate trade practice.

23-79-2903. Rules.
(a) The Insurance Commissioner may develop and promulgate rules for
the implementation and administration of this subchapter.
(b) The Department of Human Services shall apply for a waiver or add
this population to an existing waiver program to allow a beneficiary under
the Arkansas Medicaid Program to have the appropriate home and community-
based services to meet the beneficiary's needs.

/s/Bentley















03-06-2025 13:42:40 ANS278